District of Columbia statutes.
47-442

Appointment to Multistate Tax Commission; alternate.

The Mayor, with the advice and consent of the Council, shall appoint a person who shall be the District of Columbia member of the Multistate Tax Commission. Such person may designate an alternate who may represent him on the Commission and who shall be a deputy or principal assistant of the agency headed by the designated member.

July 18, 1981, D.C. Law 4-17, § 3, 28 DCR 2368
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-442.